California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(8) The aggregate sum of the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amounts computed under paragraph (4) for each eligible hospital for the period October 1, 1999, through June 30, 2000, shall be the maximum size of the payment adjustment program for the entire 1999–2000 payment adjustment year, exclusive of the supplemental payment adjustments provided for under subdivision (aj).

(9) The department shall implement this subdivision only to the extent consistent with federal medicaid law and the Medi-Cal State Plan, and only to the extent that the department determines that
 federal financial participation is available.

(aj) (1) For the 1999–2000 payment adjustment year, eligible hospitals that meet the requirements of this subdivision and that are in operation as of June 30, 2000, shall be eligible to receive a supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment, which shall be payable as a result of the facility being a disproportionate share hospital in operation as of that date, but only if the hospital has remained in operation for the period October 1, 1999, through June 30, 2000.

(2) The availability of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under this subdivision shall be determined as follows:

(A) The maximum state disproportionate share hospital allotment for California under the provisions of applicable federal medicaid rules shall be identified for the 2000
 federal fiscal year.

(B) The total amount of all payment adjustment amounts under this section (exclusive of any payments under this subdivision) applicable to the 2000 federal fiscal year, whether paid or payable, shall be determined. The applicability of payment adjustment amounts to the 2000 federal fiscal year shall be determined in accordance with federal medicaid rules, including Sections 447.297(d)(3) and 447.298 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(C) (i) The figure determined under subparagraph (B) shall be subtracted from the figure identified under subparagraph (A). If the remainder is a positive figure, supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments shall be made under this subdivision in accordance with this subparagraph and paragraph (3).

(ii) The positive remainder derived
 under clause (i) shall be the maximum amount of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under this subdivision where: (I) effective for at least the 1999–2000 payment adjustment year, federal legislation is enacted regarding the application of the OBRA 1993 payment limitation with provisions substantially similar in effect to Section 4721(e) of the federal Balanced Budget Act of 1997 (P.L. 105-33) as that related to the 1997–98 and 1998–99 payment adjustment years; and (II) all necessary amendments to the Medi-Cal State Plan implementing that federal legislation as it relates to the 1999–2000 payment adjustment year have been approved by the federal Health Care Financing Administration.

(iii) If any element set forth in clause (ii) is not satisfied, the maximum amount of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under this subdivision shall be the lesser of: (I) the positive remainder derived in clause (i); or (II) one
 hundred six million dollars ($106,000,000).

(3) (A) For purposes of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under this subdivision, only hospitals that can be categorized into either of the two groups specified in clauses (i) and (ii) below shall be eligible to receive the supplemental payment adjustments, and no hospital may qualify for more than one of the two groups. The following groups of hospitals shall be recognized:

(i) “Public hospitals,” which shall include all eligible hospitals that, as of July 1, 1999, met the definition of a public hospital.

(ii) “Nonpublic hospitals,” which shall include all eligible hospitals that, as of July 1, 1999, met the definition of a nonpublic hospital.

(B) The amount determined to be the
 maximum amount of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) shall first be allocated between the two groups of hospitals referred to in subparagraph (A) as follows:

(i) “Public hospitals”: 71.64 percent of the maximum amount.

(ii) “Nonpublic hospitals”: 28.36 percent of the maximum amount.

(C) The amount of funds allocated pursuant to subparagraph (B) to each of the particular groups of hospitals referred to in subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall then be distributed as supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments among the eligible hospitals within each particular group as follows:

(i) The department shall identify for each eligible hospital the total amount of payment adjustments under this section (exclusive of any
 payments under this subdivision) applicable to the 1999–2000 payment adjustment year, whether paid or payable. The applicability of the payment adjustment amounts to this period of time shall be determined in accordance with federal medicaid rules, including Sections 447.297(d)(3) and 447.298 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(ii) The amount identified for each hospital under clause (i) shall be compared to the OBRA 1993 payment limitation that, in accordance with applicable provisions of the Medi-Cal State Plan, the department has computed for the particular hospital for the 1999–2000 payment adjustment year. For all purposes under this subdivision, calculations of the OBRA 1993 payment limitations for public hospitals shall not be performed prior to January 1, 2000, as referred to in paragraph (6) of subdivision (ai).

(iii) Where the amount computed under clause
 (i) for the particular hospital is equal to or exceeds the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, the hospital shall not receive a supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment. Data regarding hospitals that have reached this limitation shall not be used for purposes of clauses (v) through (viii).

(iv) Where the amount computed under clause (i) for the particular hospital is less than the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, the amount computed under clause (i) shall be used for purposes of clauses (v) through (viii).

(v) The figures determined under clause (iv) for each hospital in the particular group shall be added together to determine an aggregate total for each group.

(vi) The figures determined for each hospital under clause (iv) shall be divided by the aggregate total determined under clause (v)
 for the particular group, yielding a percentage figure for each hospital.

(vii) The percentage figure determined for each hospital under clause (vi) shall be applied to the maximum portion of the funds allocated to the particular group under subparagraph (B), to determine the hospital’s pro rata share of the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments. Except, however, in the case of a nonpublic hospital that, as of July 1, 1999, met the definition of a children’s hospital, that pro rata share otherwise determined shall be multiplied by a factor of 1.09, yielding a modified pro rata share. The pro rata share for the other nonpublic hospitals shall be reduced accordingly, yielding a modified pro rata share, so that the maximum portion of the funds allocated to the nonpublic hospitals group will not be exceeded. The pro rata share or modified pro rata share, as applicable, for each hospital, as computed under this clause, shall also be used for all
 purposes relating to descending pro rata distributions under clause (viii).

(viii) In no event shall a hospital receive supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment amounts in excess of the difference between the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital and the amount computed for the hospital under clause (i). Any supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment amount, or portion thereof, that otherwise would have been payable under this paragraph to a hospital, but that is barred by this limitation, shall be distributed on a descending pro rata basis to those hospitals within the same group.

(D) The department shall make interim and final payments of the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments to hospitals on or before August 15, 2000.

(4) The department shall implement this subdivision only to the extent consistent
 with federal medicaid law and the Medi-Cal State Plan, and only to the extent that the department determines that federal financial participation is available.

(ak) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment adjustment amounts shall be payable in connection with the period of July 1 through September 30 of the 2000–01 payment adjustment year. The payment adjustment program with respect to the period October 1, 2000, through June 30, 2001, shall be structured as set forth below and in subdivision (al).

(1) (A) The department shall compute the projected total payment adjustment amounts for all eligible hospitals for the 2000–01 payment adjustment year, by determining for each eligible hospital its total per diem composite amount and multiplying that figure by the maximum number of the hospital’s Medi-Cal inpatient paid days determined under
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (l). For purposes of this subparagraph, these determinations shall be without regard to the OBRA 1993 payment limitations. Notwithstanding the foregoing, with respect to a hospital that, as of July 1, 2000, meets the definition of converted hospital, the amount otherwise determined under this subparagraph shall be reduced as necessary so as not to exceed the total amount of all payment adjustment amounts payable to the hospital under this section for that payment adjustment year in which the hospital was last an eligible hospital meeting the definition of a public hospital.

(B) The computed amount referred to in subparagraph (A) for each hospital shall be compared to the OBRA 1993 payment limitation that, in accordance with applicable provisions of the Medi-Cal State Plan, the department has computed for the particular hospital.

(C) Where the
 computed amount referred to in subparagraph (A) for the particular hospital exceeds the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, the amount computed under subparagraph (A) shall be reduced to an amount equal to the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the particular hospital. The amount so reduced shall be used for purposes of subparagraph (E).

(D) Where the computed amount referred to in subparagraph (A) for the particular hospital is equal to or less than the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, the computed amount referred to in subparagraph (A) shall be used for purposes of subparagraph (E).

(E) The amounts determined under subparagraphs (C) and (D) for all eligible hospitals shall be added together, yielding an aggregate sum. The aggregate sum shall be the unadjusted projected total payment adjustment program for the period of October 1, 2000, through June 30,
 2001, exclusive of any supplemental payment adjustments under subdivision (al).

(2) The initial maximum size of the payment adjustment program for the period October 1, 2000, through June 30, 2001, shall be set at one billion seven hundred fifty million dollars ($1,750,000,000), exclusive of any supplemental payment adjustments under subdivision (al).

(3) The department shall increase or decrease the amount determined for each eligible hospital under subparagraph (C) or (D) of paragraph (1), as applicable, by multiplying the amount by an identical percentage, yielding the hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for the period October 1, 2000, through June 30, 2001. The identical percentage figure to be used for this purpose shall be that percentage that is derived by dividing the amount set forth in paragraph (2) by the aggregate sum
 determined under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1). Notwithstanding the foregoing, however, the amount determined for a hospital under subparagraphs (C) or (D) of paragraph (1) shall not be increased so that it would exceed the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, and, where that would otherwise occur, the remaining amount that would have been allocated to the particular hospital shall be reallocated to all other hospitals (that have not reached their OBRA 1993 payment limitation) on a pro rata basis so that the aggregate sum of the tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for all hospitals equals the amount set forth in paragraph (2).

(4) The tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount computed for each eligible hospital under paragraph (3) shall be further adjusted as follows:

(A) (i) For each eligible hospital
 that meets the definition of a nonpublic-converted hospital as of July 1, 2000, the hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount shall be multiplied by a “nonpublic-converted hospital adjustment factor.” The applicable adjustment factor for the particular hospital shall be 0.81; except however, where the hospital also meets the definition of a major teaching hospital as of July 1, 2000, the applicable adjustment factor shall be that which is necessary to result in an amount for the particular hospital equal to forty million dollars ($40,000,000).

(ii) The resulting product shall be the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for the hospital for the period October 1, 2000, through June 30, 2001, which shall be paid to the hospital in accordance with paragraph (5). Notwithstanding the foregoing, however, in no case shall the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount exceed the hospital’s
 OBRA 1993 payment limitation.

(B) (i) For each eligible hospital that meets the definition of a converted hospital as of July 1, 2000, the hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount shall be multiplied by a “converted hospital adjustment factor,” derived as follows:

(I) The maximum OBRA 1993 payment limitation specified by federal law, expressed as a maximum percentage of uncompensated care costs, that is applicable to the hospital for the 2000–01 payment adjustment year shall be subtracted from that maximum percentage of uncompensated care costs that the hospital was subject to as a public hospital during the 1999–2000 payment adjustment year.

(II) The converted hospital adjustment factor shall be that figure derived in subclause (I), expressed as a fraction,
 subtracted from 1.00.

(ii) The resulting product shall be the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for the hospital for the period October 1, 2000, through June 30, 2001, which shall be paid to the hospital in accordance with paragraph (5). Notwithstanding the foregoing, however, in no case shall the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount exceed the hospital’s OBRA 1993 payment limitation.

(C) (i) For each eligible hospital that meets the definition of a nonpublic hospital as of July 1, 2000, the hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount shall be multiplied by a “nonpublic hospital adjustment factor.” The applicable adjustment factor shall be derived as follows:

(I) The tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment
 amounts determined under paragraph (3) for each nonpublic hospital shall be added together.

(II) The amount identified in paragraph (2) shall be divided by 2.1527.

(III) The amount derived under subclause (II) shall be reduced by the sum of the amounts determined for all nonpublic-converted hospitals under clause (ii) of subparagraph (A), and the sum of the amounts determined for all converted hospitals under clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) that exceed that amount equal to 31 percent of all payment adjustment amounts payable to each converted hospital under this section for that payment adjustment year in which the hospital was last an eligible hospital meeting the definition of a public hospital.

(IV) The amount computed under subclause (III) shall be divided by 2, and the result thereof further reduced by the
 amount of thirty-three million five hundred thousand dollars ($33,500,000).

(V) The applicable adjustment factor shall be that ratio that results from dividing the amount derived in subclause (IV) by the amount derived in subclause (I).

(ii) The resulting product shall be the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for the hospital for the period October 1, 2000, through June 30, 2001, which shall be paid to the hospital in accordance with paragraph (5). Notwithstanding the foregoing, however, in no case shall the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount exceed the hospital’s OBRA 1993 payment limitation, and, where that would otherwise occur, the remaining amount that would have been allocated to the particular hospital shall be reallocated to all other nonpublic hospitals (that have not reached their OBRA 1993 payment limitation) on a pro rata
 basis so that the aggregate sum of the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amounts for all nonpublic hospitals equals the amount derived in subclause (IV) of clause (i).

(D) (i) For each eligible hospital that meets the definition of a public hospital as of July 1, 2000, the hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount shall be multiplied by a “public hospital adjustment factor.” The applicable adjustment factor shall be derived as follows:

(I) The tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amounts determined under paragraph (3) for each public hospital described above shall be added together.

(II) The amount identified in paragraph (2) shall be reduced by the sums of the amounts determined for all nonpublic-converted hospitals under clause
 (ii) of subparagraph (A) and all converted hospitals under clause (ii) of subparagraph (B), and the sum of the amounts determined for all nonpublic hospitals under clause (ii) of subparagraph (C).

(III) The applicable adjustment factor shall be that ratio that results from dividing the amount derived in subclause (II) by the amount derived in subclause (I).

(ii) The resulting product shall be the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for the hospital for the period October 1, 2000, through June 30, 2001, which shall be paid to the hospital in accordance with paragraph (5). Notwithstanding the foregoing, however, in no case shall the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount exceed the hospital’s OBRA 1993 payment limitation, and, where that would otherwise occur, the remaining amount that would have been allocated to the particular hospital shall
 be reallocated to all other public hospitals (that have not reached their OBRA 1993 payment limitation) on a pro rata basis so that the aggregate sum of the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amounts for all public hospitals equals the amount derived in subclause (II) of clause (i).

(5) (A) The final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount determined for each eligible hospital for the period October 1, 2000, through June 30, 2001, shall be distributed to the hospital in 8 equal installments, each payable as of the last day of each month from October 2000 through May 2001. However, no hospital shall receive an installment for any month in which the hospital does not remain in operation for the entire month.

(B) To the extent that any hospital of either of the hospital types described in subparagraph (C) or (D) of paragraph (4) is not
 entitled to receive an installment that otherwise would be payable but for the hospital’s failure to remain in operation through the last day of a particular month, the amount that would have been paid to the hospital shall be redistributed among those hospitals of the same hospital type that remain in operation from October 1, 2000, through June 30, 2001, to be distributed on a pro rata basis. The redistributed amounts shall be payable as of June 30, 2001.

(6) If, effective for the 2001 federal fiscal year, federal legislation is enacted that amends Section 1396r-4(f) of Title 42 of the United States Code to increase the amount for California for that fiscal year above the amount that would have otherwise been identified pursuant to that section as in existence on January 1, 2000, the department shall implement the provisions of paragraphs (1) through (5) as modified below.

(A) The department shall determine the maximum state disproportionate share hospital allotment for California for the 2001 federal fiscal year under the provisions of applicable federal medicaid rules.

(B) The department shall determine the maximum state disproportionate share hospital allotment for California for the 2001 federal fiscal year that would have resulted had Section 1396r-4(f) of Title 42 of the United States Code not been amended from the version of that section as in existence on January 1, 2000.

(C) The amount determined under subparagraph (B) shall be subtracted from the amount determined under subparagraph (A).

(D) For purposes of the calculations set forth in paragraph (3) regarding each hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount, the initial amount as set
 forth in paragraph (2) shall, in each instance prior to its application in those calculations, be increased by the amount derived in subparagraph (C).

(E) The difference derived in subparagraph (C) shall be divided by the amount determined in subparagraph (B). The resulting fraction shall be multiplied by 1.145, and the result thereof added to 1.00, yielding a factor for purposes of modifying the determination of the applicable nonpublic hospital adjustment factor pursuant to subparagraph (F).

(F) The amount determined under subclause (II) of clause (i) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4) shall be multiplied by the factor derived in subparagraph (E). The resulting amount shall be used for purposes of the calculations set forth in subclause (III) of clause (i) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4).

(G) For purposes of
 the calculations set forth in clause (i) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (4) regarding the determination of the applicable public hospital adjustment factor, the initial amount as set forth in paragraph (2) shall, in each instance prior to its application in those calculations, be increased by the amount derived in subparagraph (C).

(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the entire 2000–01 payment adjustment year, no eligible hospital shall receive total payment adjustments in excess of the hospital’s OBRA 1993 payment limitation as computed by the department pursuant to the Medi-Cal State Plan.

(8) The aggregate sum of the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amounts computed under paragraph (4) for each eligible hospital for the period October 1, 2000, through June 30, 2001, shall be the maximum size of the payment adjustment program for the entire
 2000–01 payment adjustment year, exclusive of the supplemental payment adjustments provided for under subdivision (al).

(9) The department shall implement this subdivision only to the extent consistent with federal medicaid law and the Medi-Cal State Plan, and only to the extent that the department determines that federal financial participation is available.

(al) (1) For the 2000–01 payment adjustment year, eligible hospitals that meet the requirements of this subdivision and that are in operation as of June 30, 2001, shall be eligible to receive a supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment, which shall be payable as a result of the facility being a disproportionate share hospital in operation as of that date, but only if the hospital has remained in operation for the period October 1, 2000, through June 30, 2001.

(2) The availability of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under this subdivision shall be determined as follows:

(A) The maximum state disproportionate share hospital allotment for California under the provisions of applicable federal medicaid rules shall be identified for the 2001 federal fiscal year.

(B) The total amount of all payment adjustment amounts under this section (exclusive of any payments under this subdivision) applicable to the 2001 federal fiscal year, whether paid or payable, shall be determined. The applicability of payment adjustment amounts to the 2001 federal fiscal year shall be determined in accordance with federal medicaid rules.

(C) The figure determined under subparagraph (B) shall be subtracted from the figure identified
 under subparagraph (A). If the remainder is a positive figure, supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments shall be made under this subdivision in accordance with this subparagraph and paragraph (3). The positive remainder so derived shall be the maximum amount of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under this subdivision.

(3) (A) For purposes of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under this subdivision, only hospitals that can be categorized into either of the two groups specified in clauses (i) and (ii) below shall be eligible to receive the supplemental payment adjustments, and no hospital may qualify for more than one of the two groups. The following groups of hospitals shall be recognized:

(i) “Public hospitals,” which shall include all eligible hospitals that, as of July 1, 2000, met the definition of a public hospital.

(ii) “Nonpublic hospitals,” which shall include all eligible hospitals that, as of July 1, 2000, met the definition of a nonpublic hospital.

(B) The amount determined to be the maximum amount of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) shall first be allocated between the two groups of hospitals referred to in subparagraph (A) as follows:

(i) “Public hospitals”: 75 percent of the maximum amount.

(ii) “Nonpublic hospitals”: 25 percent of the maximum amount.

(C) The amount of funds allocated pursuant to subparagraph (B) to each of the particular groups of hospitals referred to in subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall then be distributed as supplemental
 lump-sum payment adjustments among the eligible hospitals within each particular group as follows:

(i) The department shall identify for each eligible hospital the total amount of payment adjustments under this section, exclusive of any payments under this subdivision, applicable to the 2000–01 payment adjustment year, whether paid or payable. The applicability of the payment adjustment amounts to this period of time shall be determined in accordance with federal medicaid rules.

(ii) The amount identified for each hospital under clause (i) shall be compared to the OBRA 1993 payment limitation that, in accordance with applicable provisions of the Medi-Cal State Plan, the department has computed for the particular hospital for the 2000–01 payment adjustment year.

(iii) Where the amount computed under clause (i) for the
 particular hospital is equal to or exceeds the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, the hospital shall not receive a supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment. Data regarding hospitals that have reached this limitation shall not be used for purposes of clauses (v) through (viii).

(iv) Where the amount computed under clause (i) for the particular hospital is less than the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, the amount computed under clause (i) shall be used for purposes of clauses (v) through (viii).

(v) The figures determined under clause (iv) for each hospital in the particular group shall be added together to determine an aggregate total for each group.

(vi) The figures determined for each hospital under clause (iv) shall be divided by the aggregate total determined under clause (v) for the
 particular group, yielding a percentage figure for each hospital.

(vii) The percentage figure determined for each hospital under clause (vi) shall be applied to the maximum portion of the funds allocated to the particular group under subparagraph (B), to determine the hospital’s pro rata share of the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments. Notwithstanding the foregoing, however, in the case of a nonpublic hospital that, as of July 1, 2000, met the definition of a children’s hospital, that pro rata share otherwise determined shall be multiplied by a factor of 1.69, yielding a modified pro rata share to be applied only with respect to the first one million dollars ($1,000,000) of the funds allocated pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (B), and, with respect to the remainder of the funds so allocated, the pro rata share otherwise determined shall be multiplied by a factor of 1.09, yielding a modified pro rata share to be applied. The pro
 rata share for the other nonpublic hospitals shall be reduced accordingly, yielding a modified pro rata share, so that the maximum portion of the funds allocated to the nonpublic hospitals group will not be exceeded. The pro rata share or modified pro rata share, as applicable, for each hospital, as computed under this clause, shall also be used for all purposes relating to descending pro rata distributions under clause (viii).

(viii) In no event shall a hospital receive supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment amounts in excess of the difference between the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital and the amount computed for the hospital under clause (i). Any supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment amount, or portion thereof, that otherwise would have been payable under this paragraph to a hospital, but that is barred by this limitation, shall be distributed on a descending pro rata basis to those hospitals within the same group.

(D) The department shall make interim and final payments of the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments to hospitals on June 30, 2001.

(4) The department shall implement this subdivision only to the extent consistent with federal medicaid law and the Medi-Cal State Plan, and only to the extent that the department determines that federal financial participation is available.

(am) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment adjustment amounts shall be payable in connection with the period of July 1 through September 30 of the 2001–02 payment adjustment year and subsequent payment adjustment years. The payment adjustment program with respect to the period October 1 through June 30 of the 2001–02 payment adjustment year and subsequent payment adjustment years shall be structured as set forth below and in
 subdivision (an).

(1) (A) The department shall compute the projected total payment adjustment amounts for all eligible hospitals for the applicable payment adjustment year, by determining for each eligible hospital its total per diem composite amount and multiplying that figure by the maximum number of the hospital’s Medi-Cal inpatient paid days determined under paragraph (2) of subdivision (l). For purposes of this subparagraph, these determinations shall be without regard to the OBRA 1993 payment limitations. Notwithstanding the foregoing, with respect to a hospital that, as of July 1 of the applicable payment adjustment year, meets the definition of a converted hospital, the amount otherwise determined under this subparagraph shall be reduced as necessary so as not to exceed the total amount of all payment adjustment amounts payable to the hospital under this section for that payment adjustment year in which the
 hospital was last an eligible hospital meeting the definition of a public hospital.

(B) The computed amount referred to in subparagraph (A) for each hospital shall be compared to the OBRA 1993 payment limitation that, in accordance with applicable provisions of the Medi-Cal State Plan, the department has computed for the particular hospital.

(C) Where the computed amount referred to in subparagraph (A) for the particular hospital exceeds the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, the amount computed under subparagraph (A) shall be reduced to an amount equal to the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the particular hospital. The amount so reduced shall be used for purposes of subparagraph (E).

(D) Where the computed amount referred to in subparagraph (A) for the particular hospital is equal to or less than the
 OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, the computed amount referred to in subparagraph (A) shall be used for purposes of subparagraph (E).

(E) The amounts determined under subparagraphs (C) and (D) for all eligible hospitals shall be added together, yielding an aggregate sum. The aggregate sum shall be the unadjusted projected total payment adjustment program for the period of October 1 through June 30 of the applicable payment adjustment year, exclusive of any supplemental payment adjustments under subdivision (an).

(2) (A) The department shall determine the maximum state disproportionate share hospital allotment for California for the applicable federal fiscal year under the provisions of applicable federal medicaid rules.

(B) The initial maximum size of the payment adjustment program
 for the period October 1 through June 30 of each applicable payment adjustment year, shall be set at one billion six hundred million dollars ($1,600,000,000), exclusive of any supplemental payment adjustments under subdivision (an).

(3) The department shall increase or decrease the amount determined for each eligible hospital under subparagraph (C) or (D) of paragraph (1), as applicable, by multiplying the amount by an identical percentage, yielding the hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for the period October 1 through June 30 of the applicable payment adjustment year. The identical percentage figure to be used for this purpose shall be that percentage that is derived by dividing the amount set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) by the aggregate sum determined under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1). Notwithstanding the foregoing, however, the amount determined for a hospital under subparagraph (C)
 or (D) of paragraph (1) shall not be increased so that it would exceed the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, and, where that would otherwise occur, the remaining amount that would have been allocated to the particular hospital shall be reallocated to all other hospitals (that have not reached their OBRA 1993 payment limitation) on a pro rata basis so that the aggregate sum of the tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for all hospitals equals the amount set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2).

(4) The tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount computed for each eligible hospital under paragraph (3) shall be further adjusted as follows:

(A) (i) For each eligible hospital that meets the definition of a nonpublic-converted hospital as of July 1 of the applicable payment adjustment year, the hospital’s
 tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount shall be multiplied by a “nonpublic-converted hospital adjustment factor.” The applicable adjustment factor for the particular hospital shall be 0.835; except, however, where the hospital also meets the definition of a major teaching hospital as of July 1 of the applicable payment adjustment year, the applicable adjustment factor shall be the lesser of 1.00, or that which is necessary to result in an amount for the particular hospital equal to thirty-five million eight hundred thousand dollars ($35,800,000).

(ii) The resulting product shall be the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for the hospital for the period October 1 through June 30 of the applicable payment adjustment year, which shall be paid to the hospital in accordance with paragraph (5). Notwithstanding the foregoing, however, in no case shall the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment
 amount exceed the hospital’s OBRA 1993 payment limitation.

(B) (i) For each eligible hospital that meets the definition of a converted hospital as of July 1 of the applicable payment adjustment year, the hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount shall be multiplied by a “converted hospital adjustment factor,” derived as follows:

(I) The maximum OBRA 1993 payment limitation specified by federal law, expressed as a maximum percentage of uncompensated care costs, that is applicable to the hospital for the particular payment adjustment year shall be subtracted from that maximum percentage of uncompensated care costs that the hospital was subject to as a public hospital during the 1999–2000 payment adjustment year.

(II) The converted hospital adjustment factor shall be
 that figure derived in subclause (I), expressed as a fraction, subtracted from 1.00.

(ii) The resulting product shall be the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for the hospital for the period October 1 through June 30 of the applicable payment adjustment year, which shall be paid to the hospital in accordance with paragraph (5). Notwithstanding the foregoing, however, in no case shall the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount exceed the hospital’s OBRA 1993 payment limitation.

(C) (i) For each eligible hospital that meets the definition of a nonpublic hospital as of July 1 of the applicable payment adjustment year, the hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount shall be multiplied by a “nonpublic hospital adjustment factor.” The applicable adjustment factor shall be derived as follows:

(I) The tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amounts determined under paragraph (3) for each nonpublic hospital shall be added together.

(II) The amount identified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) shall be divided by 2.237.

(III) The resulting figure in subclause (II) shall be increased by an amount equal to the product of the medical assistance increment multiplied by the maximum amount identified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2).

(IV) The amount derived under subclause (III) shall be reduced by the sum of the amounts determined for all nonpublic-converted hospitals under clause (ii) of subparagraph (A), and the sum of the amounts determined for all converted hospitals under clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) that exceed that amount
 equal to 31 percent of all payment adjustment amounts payable to each converted hospital under this section for that payment adjustment year in which the hospital was last an eligible hospital meeting the definition of a public hospital.

(V) The amount computed under subclause (IV) shall be divided by 2, and the result thereof further reduced by the amount of thirty-three million five hundred thousand dollars ($33,500,000).

(VI) The applicable adjustment factor shall be that ratio that results from dividing the amount derived in subclause (V) by the amount derived in subclause (I).

(ii) The resulting product shall be the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for the hospital for the period October 1 through June 30 of the applicable payment adjustment year, which shall be paid to the hospital in
 accordance with paragraph (5). Notwithstanding the foregoing, however, in no case shall the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount exceed the hospital’s OBRA 1993 payment limitation, and where that would otherwise occur, the remaining amount that would have been allocated to the particular hospital shall be reallocated to all other nonpublic hospitals (that have not reached their OBRA 1993 payment limitation) on a pro rata basis so that the aggregate sum of the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amounts for all nonpublic hospitals equals the amount derived in subclause (V) of clause (i).
